North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55. North Carolina Business Corporation Act.
Part 3. Judicial appraisal of shares.

§ 55-13-30.
Court Action.

If a shareholder makes a demand for payment under

G.S. 55-13-28

that remains unsettled, the corporation shall commence a proceeding within 60 days after receiving the payment demand by filing a complaint with the Superior Court Division of the General Court of Justice to determine whether the shareholder complied with the requirements of this Article and is entitled to appraisal rights, and, if so, to determine the fair value of the shares and accrued interest. The shareholder has the burden of proving that the shareholder complied with the requirements of this Article regarding entitlement to appraisal rights. If the superior court determines that a shareholder has not complied with the requirements of this Article, the shareholder is not entitled to appraisal rights, and the court shall dismiss the proceeding as to the shareholder. If the corporation does not commence the proceeding within the 60-day period, the corporation shall pay in cash to each shareholder the amount the shareholder demanded pursuant to

G.S. 55-13-28

, plus interest.

(a1)

Repealed by Session Laws 1997-202, s. 4.

The corporation shall commence the proceeding in the appropriate court of the county where the corporation’s principal office, or, if none, its registered office in this State is located. If the corporation is a foreign corporation without a registered office in this State, it shall commence the proceeding in the county in this State where the principal office or registered office of the domestic corporation merged with the foreign corporation was located at the time of the transaction.

The corporation shall make all shareholders, whether or not residents of this State, whose demands remain unsettled parties to the proceeding as in an action against their shares and all parties shall be served with a copy of the complaint. Nonresidents may be served by registered or certified mail or by publication as provided by law.

The jurisdiction of the superior court in which the proceeding is commenced under subsection (b) of this section is plenary and exclusive. The court may appoint one or more persons as appraisers to receive evidence and recommend a decision on the question of fair value. The appraisers shall have the powers described in the order appointing them, or in any amendment to it. The shareholders demanding appraisal rights are entitled to the same discovery rights as parties in other civil proceedings. There is no right to a trial by jury.

Each shareholder made a party to the proceeding that is determined by the superior court to have complied with the requirements of this Article and is entitled to appraisal rights is entitled to judgment either (i) for the amount, if any, by which the court finds the fair value of the shareholder’s shares, plus interest, exceeds the amount paid by the corporation to the shareholder for the shareholder’s shares or (ii) for the fair value, plus interest, of the shareholder’s shares for which the corporation elected to withhold payment under

G.S. 55-13-27

.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; 1943, c. 270; G.S., s. 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1997-202, s. 4; 1997-485, ss. 5, 5.1; 2011-347, s. 1; 2021-106, s. 5(a).

OFFICIAL COMMENT TO THE 2002 MODEL BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

Section 13.30 retains the concept of judicial appraisal as the ultimate means of determining fair value. The proceeding is to be commenced by the corporation within 60 days after a timely demand for payment under section 13.26 was received. If the proceeding is not commenced within this period, the corporation must pay the additional amounts demanded by the shareholders under section 13.26. See the Official Comment to section 13.26.

All demands for payment made under section 13.26 are to be resolved in a single proceeding brought in the county in the state where the corporation’s principal office is located or, if it is a foreign corporation, where its registered office is located, or if it has no registered office, where the principal office of the corporation which issued the shares to be appraised was located. All shareholders making section 13.26 demands must be made parties, with service by publication authorized if necessary. Appraisers may be appointed within the discretion of the court. Since the nature of the proceeding is similar to a proceeding in equity or for an accounting, section 13.30(d) provides that there is no right to a jury trial. The final judgment establishes not only the fair value of the shares in the abstract but also determines how much each shareholder who made a section 13.26 demand should actually receive.

North Carolina Commentary

This section differs from the Model Act in several respects. The North Carolina version provides for the court proceeding to be commenced by the dissenter rather than the corporation. At the commencement of the proceeding, the corporation must pay the amount of its offer to the dissenter. A dissenter who does not commence a timely court proceeding may either accept the corporation’s offer or resume his status as a nondissenting shareholder. A dissenter who takes no action resumes the status of a nondissenting shareholder.

Subsection 13.30(b) of the Model Act contains special venue provisions for proceedings under this section. That provision was omitted, and general venue rules apply.

This section expressly provides in subsection (d) that dissenters in a public corporation are not entitled to a jury trial in the appraisal of the ‘fair value” of their shares.

Supplemental North Carolina Commentary (2021)

Even if a particular transaction is one for which appraisal rights are available, the shareholder must satisfy certain requirements set forth in

G.S. 55-13-21

,

G.S. 55-13-22

, and

G.S. 55-13-23

to be entitled to appraisal rights including (1) providing a notice of intent to demand payment if the proposed transaction is effectuated, (2) not voting in favor of the proposed transaction, and (3) returning a form after the closing of the transaction to perfect appraisal rights, accompanied by any stock certificates in respect of the shareholder’s certificated shares. Despite these statutory requirements for appraisal, the North Carolina Business Court in
Reynolds Am. Inc. v. Third Motion Equities Master Fund Ltd.,
2019 NCBC 35 (2019) found that it lacked jurisdiction under

G.S. 55-13-30

to review each shareholder’s entitlement to appraisal before making a determination on fair value. Effective August 16, 2021, this section is amended to confirm that a court in an appraisal proceeding commenced on or after the effective date, in addition to determining fair value of shares, has jurisdiction to first determine whether a shareholder complied with the requirements set forth in the North Carolina Business Corporation Act so as to be entitled to appraisal rights.

§ 55-13-31.
Court costs and expenses.

The court in an appraisal proceeding commenced under

G.S. 55-13-30

shall determine all court costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and expenses of appraisers appointed by the court. The court shall assess the costs against the corporation, except that the court may assess costs against all or some of the shareholders demanding appraisal, in amounts the court finds equitable, to the extent the court finds such shareholders acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this Article.

The court in an appraisal proceeding may also assess the expenses for the respective parties, in amounts the court finds equitable:

Against the corporation and in favor of any or all shareholders demanding appraisal if the court finds the corporation did not substantially comply with the requirements of

G.S. 55-13-20

, 55-13-22, 55-13-25, or 55-13-27.

Against either the corporation or a shareholder demanding appraisal, in favor of any other party, if the court finds that the party against whom expenses are assessed acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect to the rights provided by this Article.

If the court in an appraisal proceeding finds that the expenses incurred by any shareholder were of substantial benefit to other shareholders similarly situated and that these expenses should not be assessed against the corporation, the court may direct that the expenses be paid out of the amounts awarded the shareholders who were benefited.

To the extent the corporation fails to make a required payment pursuant to

G.S. 55-13-25

, 55-13-27, or 55-13-28, the shareholder may sue directly for the amount owed and, to the extent successful, shall be entitled to recover from the corporation all expenses of the suit.

History.

1925, c. 77, s. 1; 1943, c. 270; G.S., s. 55-167; 1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1969, c. 751, s. 39; 1973, c. 469, ss. 36, 37; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 2011-347, s. 1.

OFFICIAL COMMENT TO THE 2002 MODEL BUSINESS CORPORATION ACT

Section 13.31(a) provides a general rule that the costs of the appraisal proceeding should be assessed against the corporation. Nevertheless, the court is authorized to assess these costs, in whole or in part, against all or some of the shareholders demanding appraisal if it concludes they acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith regarding the rights provided by this chapter. Similarly, under section 13.31(b), the court may assess fees and expenses of counsel and experts against the corporation or against all or some of the shareholders demanding appraisal for the reasons stated in this subsection. Under section 13.31(c), if the corporation is not required to pay the counsel fees for the shareholders demanding appraisal, the court may require all shareholders who benefitted from the services of counsel to share in the payment of such fees. The purpose of all these grants of discretion with respect to costs and counsel fees is to increase the incentives of both sides to proceed in good faith under this chapter to attempt to resolve their disagreement without the need of a formal judicial appraisal of the value of shares.

While subsections (a)-(c) allocate costs and expenses in an appraisal proceeding, subsection (d) covers the situation where the corporation was obligated to make payment and did not meet this obligation. In that event, the shareholder may sue the corporation directly for the amount owed. In such an action, subsection (d) requires the court, to the extent the shareholder was successful, to impose all costs and expenses, including counsel fees, on the corporation.

North Carolina Commentary

Subsection (a) of this section differs from the Model Act by providing simply that “the court shall assess the costs as it finds equitable.” This language was adapted from former G.S. 55-113(e). The words “either or” were inserted before “any other” in subdivision (b)(2) to clarify a possible ambiguity.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-347, s. 1, effective October 1, 2011, substituted “expenses” for “counsel fees” in the section catchline; and rewrote the section.

§§ 55-13-32 through 55-13-39.

Reserved for future codification purposes.